Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.130

Administrative hearings revolving fund—Created, purposes.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

The administrative hearings revolving fund is hereby created in the state treasury for the purpose of centralized funding, accounting, and distribution of the actual costs of the services provided to agencies of the state government by the office of administrative hearings.

[ 1982 c 189 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1982 c 189: See note following RCW 34.12.020.